Mississippi, session 2026, HB316.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 73-14-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-14-17.  An applicant for a license shall pay a fee of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) and shall show to the satisfaction of the board that he: (a)  Is * * *twenty‑one (21) eighteen (18) years of age or older. (b)  Has an education equivalent to a four-year course in an accredited high school. Any increase in the fee charged by the board under this section shall be in accordance with the provisions of Section 41-3-65. No governmental entity or agency shall be required to pay the fee or fees set forth in this section. Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64. SECTION 2.  Section 73-14-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-14-19.  (1)  An applicant for a license who is notified by the board that he has fulfilled the requirements of Section 73-14-17 and upon paying a testing fee determined by the department as necessary to cover the expense of the administration of the examination not to exceed One Hundred Fifty Dollars ($150.00), shall appear at a time, place and before such persons as the board may designate, to be examined by written and practical test in order to demonstrate that he is qualified to practice the fitting, dispensing and selling of hearing aids.  Any increase in the fee charged by the department under this section shall be in accordance with the provisions of Section 41-3-65. (2)  An applicant for a license shall have eighteen (18) months from the date of filing the initial application with the board to successfully complete all required examinations. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.